Missouri, session 2026, SB1259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 130.034, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 130.034,
to read as follows:
130.034. 1. Contributions as defined in section
130.011, received by any committee shall not be converted to
any personal use.
2. Contributions may be used for any purpose allowed
by law including, but not limited to:
(1) Any ordinary expenses incurred relating to a
campaign;
(2) Any ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in
connection with the duties of a holder of elective office;
(3) Any childcare expenses that result directly from
campaigning for office or in connection with the duties of
public office that would not have been otherwise incurred
but for those activities. Eligible childcare expenses
include any expenses that provide for the well-being and
protection of the child, provided that no expenditure shall
be made to a member of the candidate's or office holder's
household;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1259 2
(4) Any expenses associated with the duties of
candidacy or of elective office pertaining to the
entertaining of or providing social courtesies to
constituents, professional associations, or other holders of
elective office;
[(4)] (5) The return of any contribution to the person
who made the contribution to the candidate or holder of
elective office;
[(5)] (6) To contribute to a political organization
[or candidate committee] as allowed by law;
[(6)] (7) To establish a new committee as defined by
this chapter;
[(7)] (8) To make an unconditional gift which is fully
vested to any charitable, fraternal or civic organizations
or other associations formed to provide for some good in the
order of benevolence, if such candidate, former candidate or
holder of elective office or such person's immediate family
gain no direct financial benefit from the unconditional gift;
[(8)] (9) Except when such candidate, former candidate
or holder of elective office dies while the committee
remains in existence, the committee may make an
unconditional gift to a fund established for the benefit of
the spouse and children of the candidate, former candidate
or holder of elective office. The provisions of this
subdivision shall expire October 1, 1997.
3. Upon the death of the candidate, former candidate
or holder of elective office who received such
contributions, all contributions shall be disposed of
according to this section and any funds remaining after
final settlement of the candidate's decedent's estate, or if
no estate is opened, then twelve months after the

SB 1259 3
candidate's death, will escheat to the state of Missouri to
be deposited in the general revenue fund.
4. No contributions, as defined in section 130.011,
received by a candidate, former candidate or holder of
elective office shall be used to make restitution payments
ordered of such individual by a court of law or for the
payment of any fine resulting from conviction of a violation
of any local, state or federal law.
5. Committees described in subdivision (18) of section
130.011 shall make expenditures only for the purpose of
determining whether an individual will be a candidate. Such
expenditures include polling information, mailings, personal
appearances, telephone expenses, office and travel expenses
but may not include contributions to other candidate
committees.
6. Any moneys in the exploratory committee fund may be
transferred to the candidate committee upon declaration of
candidacy for the position being explored. Such funds shall
be included for the purposes of reporting and limitation.
In the event that candidacy is not declared for the position
being explored, the remaining exploratory committee funds
shall be returned to the contributors on a pro rata basis.
In no event shall the amount returned exceed the amount
given by each contributor nor be less than ten dollars.
7. Funds held in candidate committees, campaign
committees, debt service committees, and exploratory
committees shall be liquid such that these funds shall be
readily available for the specific and limited purposes
allowed by law. These funds may be invested only in short-
term treasury instruments or short-term bank certificates
with durations of one year or less, or that allow the
removal of funds at any time without any additional

SB 1259 4
financial penalty other than the loss of interest income.
Continuing committees, political party committees, and other
committees such as out-of-state committees not formed for
the benefit of any single candidate or ballot issue shall
not be subject to the provisions of this subsection. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to restrict the
placement of funds in an interest-bearing checking account.
✓